Wyoming, session 2025, SF0123.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-13-338 is created to read:

21-13-338. Crossing guard program grant; application;
criteria; limitations.

(a) For school year 2025-2026 through school year
2027-2028, a school district may apply to the state
department of education for state assistance, train and
SF0123

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0677
educate volunteers and faculty, pay wages for faculty and
purchase equipment for a crossing guard program for schools
located within the school district. Amounts awarded under
this section shall be in addition to and shall not be
considered in determining the school foundation program
amount under the education resource block grant model
pursuant to W.S. 21-13-309.

(b) A grant awarded under this section shall be for a
period of one (1) year and shall not exceed ten thousand
dollars ($10,000.00) per school per year. Applications by
school districts for a grant under this section shall be
submitted on a form and in a manner specified by rule of
the department of education, shall be filed with the
department of education on or before June 30 each year to
secure a grant during the immediately succeeding school
year and shall at a minimum include:

(i) A proposal documenting the need for crossing
guards and a plan for expenditure of grant amounts. The
proposal shall identify at minimum the following:

SF0123

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0677
(A) The proposed schools and intersections
where volunteers and school district employees will act as
crossing guards if awarded funding under the grant program;

(B) The number of hours and the number of
volunteers and school district employees that will act as
crossing guards if awarded funding under the grant program;

(C) The training and education requirements
for volunteers and school district employees acting as a
crossing guards if awarded under funding under the grant
program;

(D) Equipment, with itemized prices for
each piece of equipment, to be funded by the grant.

(ii) Other necessary information required by the
department of education.

(c) Not later than August 1 of each applicable school
year and following review of applications submitted under
this section, the department of education shall notify
applicant school districts of its decision to award or deny
SF0123

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0677
a grant application and shall provide each applicant
district a written statement of the reasons for approving
or denying the application. The department of education may
approve or deny an application in whole or in part and may
award funds for specific schools within a school district,
while denying funds for others. If an application is
approved, the department shall award the grant from amounts
made available by legislative appropriation from the public
school foundation program account for purposes of this
section.

(d) Each school district receiving a grant under this
section shall report to the department of education the
expenditure of amounts awarded under this section and shall
provide other information as required by rule of the
department of education.

(e) Not later than August 1 of each applicable school
year, the department of education shall report to the joint
education interim committee on the expenditure of grant
awards.

SF0123

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0677
(f) The department of education, in consultation with
the department of transportation, shall promulgate rules
necessary to carry out this section. The rules shall, at
minimum, identify training and education requirements for
volunteers and school district employees acting as crossing
guards and funded by the crossing guard grant program
created by this section.

(g) This section is repealed effective July 1, 2028.

Section 2. There is appropriated four million nine
hundred fifty thousand dollars ($4,950,000.00) from the
public school foundation program account to the department
of education‑school finance for the grant program created by
section 1 of this act. Not more than one million six
hundred fifty thousand dollars ($1,650,000.00) shall be
expended each school year. This appropriation shall be for
the period beginning July 1, 2025 and ending June 30, 2028.
This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for
any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds
remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided
by law on June 30, 2028. It is the intent of the
legislature that this appropriation not be included in the
SF0123

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0677
standard budget for the department of education for the
immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
SF0123